Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-232
Constitutional convention; preliminary survey committee; appointment; duties.

For the purpose of aiding the convention in the discharge of its duties, the Supreme Court of the State of Nebraska shall, within thirty days after the proclamation of the Governor that the calling of a constitutional convention has been approved by the electors of this state, appoint a preliminary survey committee to consist of five members. The committee shall compile and tabulate information relating to the constitutions of the different states or of other constitutional governments and such other information as the committee shall deem pertinent to the problems to be dealt with by the constitutional convention.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 21, p. 553.